Arkansas, session 2025, SB278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 11, Chapter 11, is repealed.

CHAPTER 11 — EMPLOYMENT OFFICES AND AGENCIES

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

11-11-101. Recruitment of labor by foreign labor agents.
(a) No foreign labor agent, labor bureau or employment agency, or any
other person shall enter this state and attempt to hire, induce, or take from
this state any labor, singularly or in groups, for any purpose, whether or
not a fee or charge is extracted from the worker, without first applying to
*LGL103*
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
the Director of the Division of Labor for a license to do so and filing with
the director:
(1) A statement as to where the labor is to be taken, for what
purpose, for what length of time, and whether transportation is to be paid to
and from the destination, if temporary;
(2) A statement of the financial standing of the employer
desiring the labor;
(3) An affidavit of authority to represent the employer in this
state; and
(4) Whatever other information the director may require.
(b)(1) The director shall determine whether the person desiring the
labor from this state is a labor agent, labor bureau, or employment agency
and, if so, whether the applicant is qualified to be licensed under the laws
of this state and according to the provisions of this section.
(2) The director, after the investigation, may refuse to license
or register the applicant until the applicant has complied with the
provisions of this section.
(3) The applicant shall, in the event of unfavorable action by
the director, have the right of appeal to the proper court.
(c) This section is cumulative to all existing laws affecting the
hiring or employment of labor.

Subchapter 2 — Private Employment Agencies

11-11-201. Title.
This subchapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Private Employment Agency
Act of 1975”.

11-11-202. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Agency manager” means the individual designated by the
employment agency to conduct the general management, administration, and
operation of a designated employment agency office. Every employment agency
must maintain a licensed agency manager at each of its separate office
locations;
(2) “Applicant” except when used to describe an applicant for an
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
employment agency or agency manager's or counselor's license means any
person, whether employed or unemployed, seeking or entering into an
arrangement for employment or change of employment through the medium or
service of an employment agency;
(5) “Employee” means a person performing or seeking to perform
work or service of any kind or character for compensation;
(6) “Employer” means a person employing or seeking to employ a
person for compensation;
(7)(A) “Employment agent” or “employment agency” means any
person engaged for hire, compensation, gain, or profit in the business of
furnishing persons seeking employment with information or other service
enabling the persons to procure employment by or through employers or
furnishing any other person who may be seeking to employ or may be in the
market for help of any kind with information enabling the other person to
procure help.
(B) However, “employment agent” or “employment agency”
does not mean:
(i) Any person who prepares resumes for individuals
for employment purposes if the person who prepares the resumes does not refer
or purport to refer prospective employees to employers or employers to
prospective employees, does not represent himself or herself as an employment
agency, or does not have any financial connection with any employment agency;
(ii) Any person who employs individuals to render
part-time or temporary services to, for, or under the direction of a third
person if the person employing the individuals, in addition to paying wages
or salaries, pays federal Social Security taxes and state and federal
unemployment insurance and secures work-service to, for, or under the
direction of a third person;
(iii) Any bona fide nursing school, nurses'
registry, management consulting firm, business school, or vocational school
whose primary function and purpose is training and education, except that if
such an organization charges a fee, directly or indirectly, for job placement
of individuals, the organization shall be an employment agency within the
meaning of this subchapter;
(iv) A labor organization;
(v) Any person who publishes advertisements placed
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
and paid for by a third person seeking employment or an employee, provided
that the person does not procure or offer to procure employment or employees;
or
(vi) Any person who contracts with an employer to
recruit employees for the employer without charge to the prospective
employee;
(8) “Employment counselor” means an employee of any employment
agency who interviews, counsels, or advises applicants or employers, or both,
on employment or allied problems or who makes or arranges contracts or
contacts between employers and employees. The term “employment counselor”
includes employees who solicit orders for employees from prospective
employers;
(9) “Fee” shall mean anything of value, including any money or
other valuable consideration exacted, charged, collected, or received,
directly or indirectly, or paid or contracted to be paid for any services or
act by an employment agency; and
(10) “Person” means any individual, company, firm, association,
partnership, or corporation.

11-11-203. Penalty.
(a) The Director of the Division of Labor shall have authority to
impose a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than
five hundred dollars ($500) for violation of the provisions of this
subchapter by an employment agency or its employees or agents.
(b) The director shall notify the employment agency in writing of the
reasons for imposition of a fine and at that time shall make available to the
employment agency a signed written statement by any individual having filed a
complaint with the director relative to the matter for which a fine has been
imposed by the director.
(c) The agency shall have the right to a hearing before the director
and the right to judicial review provided by § 11-11-223 with respect to the
fine.

11-11-204. Director and division — Powers and duties.
(a) It shall be the duty of the Division of Labor, and it shall have
the power, jurisdiction, and authority to administer and enforce the
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
provisions of this subchapter.
(b) The Director of the Division of Labor shall have the power,
jurisdiction, and authority to issue licenses to employment agencies, agency
managers, and counselors and to refuse to issue, revoke, or suspend the
licenses when, after due investigation, and in compliance with the procedures
set forth in §§ 11-11-221 and 11-11-222, the director finds that the
applicant is for good and sufficient cause unfit to be an employment agent,
agency manager, or counselor within the meaning of this subchapter or any
rules or orders lawfully promulgated under this subchapter.
(c)(1) Complaints against any person, employment agent, agency
manager, or counselor may be made to the division orally or in writing.
(2) The director shall have the power to compel attendance of
witnesses by issuance of subpoenas, administer oaths, direct production of
documents and records, and direct taking of testimony and evidence concerning
all matters within the jurisdiction of the division.
(3) The director may order testimony to be taken by deposition
in any proceeding pending before the division at any stage of the proceeding.
(4) The director or his or her duly authorized agent shall at
all reasonable times have access to, for the purpose of examination and
copying, the books, records, papers, and documents of any person being
investigated or proceeded against under the provisions of this subchapter, so
long as the books, records, papers, or documents sought to be inspected or
copied are reasonably related to the investigation or proceeding being
conducted by the director.
(5) The director or his or her authorized agent shall, upon
application of any party to proceedings before the director, issue to the
party subpoenas requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the
production of any books, records, papers, or documents reasonably related to
issues involved in proceedings before the director or an investigation
conducted by the director.
(6) If any person in proceedings before the director or in
investigations conducted by the director disobeys or resists any lawful order
or process issued by the director or his or her authorized agents, or fails
to produce, after being lawfully directed to do so, any book, paper, record,
or document, or refuses to appear and testify after being subpoenaed to do
so, the director shall certify the facts to any court of competent
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
jurisdiction in the state or to the Pulaski County Circuit Court.
(7) The court shall have authority to conduct hearings and
punish any person for failure or refusal to testify or produce books, papers,
documents, or records subpoenaed or ordered by the director as though the
conduct constituted contempt of court.
(8) Witnesses summoned by the director or his or her authorized
agent shall be paid the same fees and mileage paid to witnesses in the courts
of this state.
(d)(1) The director may prescribe such rules for the conduct of the
business of private employment agencies as necessary to implement this
subchapter.
(2) These rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall
be enforced by the director in the same manner as the provisions of this
subchapter.
(3) Adoption of rules pursuant to this subsection shall be
carried out in compliance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §
25-15-201 et seq.
(e) The division shall have authority to investigate employment
agents, agency managers, and counselors. The division shall have the right to
examine records required by law to be kept and maintained by employment
agents, agency managers, and counselors and to examine the offices where the
business is or shall be conducted by them.
(f) The division may seek to recover in a court of competent
jurisdiction fees charged or collected in violation of this subchapter.

11-11-208. License required — Penalties.
(a) No person shall engage in the business of or act as an employment
agent, agency manager, or counselor unless he or she first obtains a license
from the Division of Labor.
(b)(1)(A) Any person who shall engage in the business of or act as an
employment agent, agency manager, or counselor without first procuring a
license is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(B) He or she shall be punished by a fine of not less than
fifty dollars ($50.00) and not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for
each day of acting as an employment agent, agency manager, or counselor
without a license or by imprisonment for not more than three (3) months, or
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
by both.
(2) In addition to the penalties described in subdivision (b)(1)
of this section, upon petition of the Director of the Division of Labor, any
court in the state having the statutory power to enjoin or restrain shall
have jurisdiction to restrain and enjoin any person who engages in the
business of or acts as an employment agent, agency manager, or counselor
without having first procured a license for so engaging or acting.

11-11-209. Certificate of exemption required for certain
organizations.
(a) Bona fide nursing schools, nurses' registries, management
consulting firms, business schools, vocational schools whose primary function
and purpose is training and education, and resume services shall obtain from
the Director of the Division of Labor a certificate of exemption from the
requirements of this subchapter.
(b) In connection with issuance of a certificate of exemption and with
respect to an organization's continued eligibility for a previously issued
certificate of exemption, the director shall have those investigative powers
conferred by § 11-11-204.

11-11-210. Employment counselor's license — Application —
Qualifications.
(a) To be eligible for application for an employment counselor's
license, the applicant shall be:
(1) A citizen of the United States;
(2) Of good moral character;
(3) A person whose license has not been revoked within two (2)
years from the date of application; and
(4) Able to demonstrate business integrity.
(b)(1) Every applicant for an initial license for employment counselor
shall file with the Division of Labor a written application on a form
prescribed and furnished by the Director of the Division of Labor.
(2) The applicant shall file at least two (2) letters of
character reference from persons of reputed business or professional
integrity.
(3) This application shall contain information prescribed by the
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
director.

11-11-211. Agency manager license — Application — Qualifications.
(a) To be eligible to apply for a license to act as an agency manager,
the applicant shall be:
(1) A citizen of the United States;
(2) Of good moral character;
(3) At least twenty-one (21) years of age;
(4) A person whose license has not been revoked within two (2)
years from the date of the application;
(5) A person who has completed the twelfth grade, except that
the Director of the Division of Labor may establish proof necessary to him or
her that the applicant is possessed of a twelfth-grade education in terms of
intellectual competency, judgment, and achievement; and
(6) A person who demonstrates business integrity, financial
responsibility, and judgment.
(b)(1) Every applicant for an initial license for agency manager shall
file with the Division of Labor a written application on a form prescribed
and furnished by the director.
(2) The applicant shall file at least two (2) letters of
character reference from persons of reputed business or professional
integrity.
(3) This application shall contain information prescribed by the
director.

11-11-212. Employment agency license — Application — Qualifications.
(a) To be eligible to apply for a license to operate an employment
agency, the applicant shall be:
(1) A citizen of the United States;
(2) Of good moral character;
(3) At least twenty-one (21) years of age;
(4) A person whose license has not been revoked within two (2)
years from the date of the application;
(5) A person who has completed the twelfth grade, except that
the Director of the Division of Labor may establish proof necessary to him or
her that the applicant is possessed of a twelfth-grade education in terms of
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
intellectual competency, judgment, and achievement; and
(6) A person who demonstrates business integrity, financial
responsibility, and judgment.
(b)(1) Every applicant for an initial employment agency license and
every applicant for a renewal license shall file with the Director of the
Division of Labor a completed application on a form prescribed and furnished
by the Director of the Division of Labor.
(2)(A) The application shall be signed by the applicant and
sworn to before anyone qualified by law to administer oaths.
(B) If the applicant is a corporation, the application
shall state the names and home addresses of all shareholders, officers, and
directors of the corporation and shall be signed and sworn to by the
president, treasurer, and secretary thereof.
(C) If the applicant is a partnership, the application
shall state the names and home addresses of all partners therein and shall be
signed and sworn to by all of them.
(3) The applicant shall file at least two (2) letters of
character reference from persons of reputed business or professional
integrity.
(4) This application shall also contain such other information
as the Director of the Division of Labor may prescribe.

11-11-213. Employment agency license — Bond required — Action on the
bond.
(a)(1) Every application for issuance or renewal of an employment
agency's license shall be accompanied by a bond in the sum of five thousand
dollars ($5,000) with a duly licensed surety company or companies authorized
to do business in this state.
(2) The terms and conditions of the bond shall be approved by
the Director of the Division of Labor.
(3) The bond shall be conditioned that the employment agency and
each member, employee, shareholder, director, or officer of a person, firm,
partnership, corporation, or association operating as the employment agency
will not violate the provisions of this subchapter or violate rules or orders
lawfully promulgated by the director or violate the terms of any contract
made by the employment agent in the conduct of its business.
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
(b)(1) If any person shall be aggrieved by the misconduct of any
licensee, that person may maintain an action in his or her own name upon the
bond of the employment agency in any court of competent jurisdiction or in
the Pulaski County Circuit Court.
(2)(A) All claims shall be assignable, and the assignee shall be
entitled to the same remedies upon the bond of the licensee as the person
aggrieved would have been entitled to if the claim had not been assigned.
(B) Any claim so assigned may be enforced in the name of
the assignee.
(3) Any remedies given by this section shall not be exclusive of
any other remedy that would otherwise exist.
(c) Action on the bond required by this section may be maintained by
the director in the name of the state in any court of competent jurisdiction
or in the Pulaski County Circuit Court, for the benefit of any person or
persons aggrieved by the misconduct of the licensee.
(d)(1) If any licensee fails to file a new bond with the Division of
Labor within thirty (30) days after notice of cancellation by the surety of
the bond required by this section, the license issued to the principal under
the bond is suspended until such time as a new surety bond is filed with and
approved by the director.
(2) A person whose license is suspended pursuant to this
subsection shall not carry on the business of an employment agency during the
period of the suspension.

11-11-214. Investigation of license applicant by director.
(a) Upon filing of an application for a license as provided in this
subchapter, the Director of the Division of Labor shall cause an
investigation to be made regarding the character, business integrity, and
financial responsibility of the license applicant.
(b) The director shall also determine the suitability or unsuitability
of the applicant's proposed office location.
(c) An application for an employment agency's, agency manager's, or
employment counselor's license shall be rejected by the director if it is
found that any person named in the license application is not of good moral
character, business integrity, or financial responsibility or if there is
good and sufficient reason within the meaning and purpose of this subchapter
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
for rejecting the application.

11-11-215. Employment agency license — Scope — Change of license.
(a)(1) An employment agent's license issued pursuant to this
subchapter shall protect only those persons to whom it is issued and only the
location for which it is issued.
(2) A separate license shall be required for each separate
office location operated by an employment agency.
(3) No license shall be valid to protect any business transacted
under any name other than that designated in the license.
(b) No employment agent shall permit any person not mentioned in the
license or license application to become a member, officer, director,
shareholder, or partner in the conduct of the business of the employment
agent unless written consent of the Director of the Division of Labor and
written consent of the surety on the bond required by this subchapter shall
first be obtained.
(c) The location of an employment agency shall not be changed without
written consent from the Director of the Division of Labor, and a new license
application shall be required for any change of office location in excess of
twenty-five (25) miles.
(d) A charge of ten dollars ($10.00) shall be made by the Division of
Labor for the recording of authorization for each change of office location
authorized by this section.

11-11-216. Examination for licenses.
(a)(1)(A) Before the Director of the Division of Labor issues a
license to an applicant for a permanent employment agent's, permanent agency
manager's, or permanent counselor's license, the applicant shall be required
to successfully complete a written examination prepared by the director.
(B) The examination shall establish the competency of the
applicant to:
(i) Operate and conduct an employment agency; or
(ii) Perform service as an agency manager or counselor for
the agency.
(2) No examination shall be required for renewal of any license
issued pursuant to this subchapter unless the license has been suspended,
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
revoked, or submitted late, causing the application to be treated as a new
application.
(b) The Division of Labor shall hold examinations at such times and
places as it shall reasonably determine, except that examinations shall be
given to license applicants at least once every sixty (60) days.
(c)(1) An examination fee of five dollars ($5.00) shall be paid by
each applicant in addition to the license fee.
(2) The examination fee shall be retained by the division,
whether or not the applicant successfully completes the examination.
(3) The examination fee shall be forfeited if the applicant does
not take the examination within three (3) months of the application date.

11-11-217. License fees.
(a) Before a permanent license shall be granted to a license
applicant, an applicant shall pay the following annual fee for each license:
(1) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for an employment agency;
(2) Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for an employment agency
manager; and
(3) Twenty dollars ($20.00) for an employment counselor.
(b) Multiple licenses for a person simultaneously performing the
functions of employment agent, agency manager, or employment counselor will
not be required. The person shall procure a license commensurate with the
highest level of job duties and responsibilities customarily and regularly
performed by the person.
(c) All moneys received from licensing shall be deposited into the
general fund of the State Treasury.

11-11-218. Temporary licenses.
(a)(1) The Director of the Division of Labor shall have authority to
issue a temporary license for operation of a private employment agency, which
shall be valid for no more than ninety (90) days, upon submission by the
applicant for the license of:
(A) A properly completed application form furnished and
approved by the director;
(B) Submission of evidence of the applicant's compliance
with the bonding requirements of this subchapter; and
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
(C) Payment of a temporary license fee of one hundred
dollars ($100).
(2) The temporary license may be issued only if, after
investigation, it reasonably appears that the applicant will meet the
qualifications for a permanent private employment agency license.
(b)(1) The director shall have authority to issue temporary licenses
for agency managers and employment counselors, which shall be valid for no
more than ninety (90) days, upon submission by the applicant for such license
of:
(A) A properly completed application form, furnished and
approved by the director; and
(B) Payment of a temporary license fee of ten dollars
($10.00).
(2) The temporary licenses for agency managers and employment
counselors may be issued only if, after investigation, it reasonably appears
that the applicant will meet the qualifications for a permanent license as
agency manager or employment counselor.
(3) Temporary licenses issued to agency managers and employment
counselors are nontransferable and are automatically rescinded upon
suspension or termination of the employment of the agency manager or
employment counselor.
(4) The director shall approve or reject an application for a
temporary agency manager's license or temporary employment counselor's
license within five (5) days after receipt of a properly completed
application for the license.

11-11-219. Renewal of licenses.
(a) Every license issued pursuant to this subchapter shall remain in
force for one (1) year from the date of issue or until the end of the state's
fiscal year, whichever occurs first, unless the license has been revoked
pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter.
(b) Applications for renewal of all licenses provided by this
subchapter must be filed with the Director of the Division of Labor no later
than thirty (30) days prior to expiration of the license.
(c) Any licensee who fails to renew a license by the expiration date
shall be automatically suspended from the right to engage in the activity
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
authorized by the license until the license is renewed.
(d) Every application for renewal of a license must be accompanied by
payment of the required license fee and evidence of compliance with the
bonding requirements of this subchapter.

11-11-220. Cessation of business by licensee.
(a)(1) If an employment agent ceases business operations, the agent
shall, as soon as reasonably possible, notify the Division of Labor and shall
deliver or forward by mail the agent's license to the division. Failure to
give notice, or failure to deliver such employment agent's license, shall be
a violation of § 11-11-208.
(2)(A) When one (1) or more individuals, on the basis of whose
qualifications an agency license has been obtained, ceases to be connected
with the licensed business for any reason whatsoever, the agency business may
be carried on for a temporary period not to exceed thirty (30) days, under
such terms and conditions as the Director of the Division of Labor shall
provide by rule for the orderly closing of the business or the replacement
and qualification of a new member, partner, or corporate officer, director,
or shareholder.
(B) The agency's authorization to continue to do business
under this subchapter beyond the thirty-day period provided in this
subdivision (a)(2) shall be contingent upon approval by the Director of the
Division of Labor of any new member, principal, partner, officer, director,
or shareholder.
(b)(1) If an agency manager terminates his or her employment with an
employment agency by which he or she is employed, the agency shall notify the
division, as soon as is reasonably possible, to enable the division to know
at all times the identity of the person charged with the general management
of each of the agency's office locations.
(2) The employment agency shall also deliver or forward by mail
the agency manager's license, together with the reasons why the agency
manager has terminated his or her position with the employment agency.
(c) If an employment counselor terminates his or her employment with
the employment agency by which he or she is employed, the agency shall, as
soon as is reasonably possible, notify the division and deliver or forward by
mail the employment counselor's license to the division, together with the
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
reasons for his or her termination.

11-11-221. Issuance, refusal, suspension, or revocation of license —
Grounds.
(a) The Director of the Division of Labor shall issue a license as an
employment agent, agency manager, or counselor to any person who qualifies
for the license under the terms of this subchapter.
(b) The director may, in addition, refuse to issue a license to any
person or may suspend or revoke the license of any employment agent, agency
manager, or employment counselor or impose administrative fines as provided
for in § 11-11-203 when the director finds that any of the following
conditions exist:
(1) That the employment agent, agency manager, or counselor has
violated any of the provisions of this subchapter;
(2) That the employment agent, agency manager, or counselor has
violated any of the rules or other orders lawfully promulgated by the
director;
(3) That the employment agent, agency manager, or counselor has
violated the conditions of the bond required by § 11-11-213;
(4) That the person, employment agent, agency manager, or
employment counselor has engaged in a fraudulent, deceptive, or dishonest
practice;
(5) That the person, employment agent, agency manager, or
employment counselor has been legally adjudicated incompetent; or
(6) That the applicant is for good and sufficient cause unfit to
be an employment agent, agency manager, or employment counselor within the
meaning of this subchapter or of any of the rules or orders lawfully
promulgated by the director.
(c) This section and § 11-11-222 shall not be construed to relieve any
person from civil liability or from criminal prosecution under the provisions
of this subchapter or under other laws of this state.

11-11-222. Refusal, suspension, or revocation of license — Notice and
hearing.
(a)(1) The Director of the Division of Labor may not refuse to issue a
license or suspend or revoke a license unless it furnishes the person,
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
employment agent, agency manager, or employment counselor with a written
statement of the charges against him or her and affords him or her an
opportunity to be heard on the charges.
(2) At the time that written charges are furnished to an
employment agency, the director shall make available to the agency a signed
written statement by any individual having filed a complaint with the
director relative to the matter for which charges have been filed by the
director.
(3) The agency shall be given at least twenty (20) days’ written
notice of the date and time of the hearing. The notice shall conform to the
standards for notices set forth in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act,
§ 25-15-201 et seq.
(4) The notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt
requested, to the address of the person as shown on his or her application
for license, or it may be served in the manner in which a summons is served
in civil cases commenced in the circuit courts of this state.
(b)(1) At the time and place fixed for the hearing, the director shall
hold the hearing and thereafter make his or her order either dismissing the
charges or refusing, suspending, or revoking the license.
(2)(A) At the hearing, the accused shall have the right to
appear personally and by counsel and to cross-examine witnesses against him
or her.
(B)(i) He or she shall be allowed to produce evidence and
witnesses in his or her defense and shall have the right to have witnesses
subpoenaed.
(ii) The subpoenas shall be issued by the director.
(c)(1) A stenographic record of all proceedings shall be made, and a
transcript of the proceedings shall be made if desired by the Division of
Labor or by the accused.
(2) The transcript shall be paid for by the party ordering it.

11-11-223. Judicial review of director's administrative orders.
(a) If the Director of the Division of Labor refuses to grant a
license, suspends or revokes a license that has been granted, or imposes an
administrative fine as provided in §§ 11-11-213, 11-11-221, and 11-11-222,
the person adversely affected or aggrieved by the order of the director
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
issued pursuant to the provisions of §§ 11-11-221 and 11-11-222 may obtain a
review of the order.
(b) The order may be brought in the circuit court in the judicial
district in which the violation is alleged to have occurred, where the
employment agent, manager, or counselor worked, or in the Pulaski County
Circuit Court or, if the aggrieved person is a nonresident of the state, in
the Pulaski County Circuit Court.
(c)(1) The review may be obtained by filing in the court within thirty
(30) days following the issuance of the order a written petition praying that
the order be modified or set aside.
(2)(A) A copy of the petition shall be forthwith transmitted by
the clerk of the court to the Division of Labor.
(B) Thereupon, the division shall file in the court the
record of proceedings before the division.
(d) Upon the filing, the court shall have jurisdiction of the
proceedings and of the questions determined therein and shall have power to
grant such temporary relief or restraining order as it deems just and proper
and to make and enter upon the pleadings, testimony, and proceedings set
forth in the record a decree affirming, modifying, or setting aside, in whole
or in part, the order of the director and enforcing the same to the extent
that the order is affirmed.
(e) Commencement of proceedings under this section shall not, unless
ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the order of the director.
(f)(1) No objection which has not been urged before the director shall
be considered by the court.
(2) The findings of the director with respect to questions of
fact, if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a
whole, shall be conclusive.
(g)(1) If any party shall apply to the court for leave to adduce
additional evidence and shall show to the satisfaction of the court that the
additional evidence is material and that there were reasonable grounds for
the failure to adduce the evidence in the hearing before the director, the
court may order the additional evidence to be taken before the director and
made a part of the record.
(2)(A) The director may modify his or her findings as to the
facts or make new findings, by reason of additional evidence so taken and
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
filed, and the director shall file the modified or new findings with the
court.
(B) The findings with respect to questions of fact, if
supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, shall
be conclusive.
(h) Upon the filing of the record with it, the jurisdiction of the
court shall be exclusive, and its judgment and decree shall be final, except
that it shall be subject to review by the Supreme Court.
(i)(1) The division shall certify the record of its proceedings if the
party commencing the proceedings shall pay to it the cost of preparing and
certifying the records, including the recording and transcribing of all
testimony introduced in the proceedings.
(2) If payment of the costs of preparing and certifying the
records, including the recording and transcribing of all testimony introduced
in the proceedings, is not made by the party commencing the proceedings for
review within ten (10) days after notice from the division of the cost of
preparing and certifying the record, the circuit court in which the
proceeding is pending, on motion of the director, shall dismiss the petition.

11-11-224. Deceptive practices.
(a) No employment agent shall publish or cause to be published any
fraudulent or misleading notice or advertisement of the employment agency by
means of cards, circulars, or signs or in newspapers or other publications.
(b) All letterheads, receipts, and blanks shall contain the full name
and address of the employment agency, and the licensee shall state in all
notices and advertisements the fact that the licensee is or conducts a
private employment agency.
(c) No employment agency shall print, publish, or paint on any sign or
window or insert in any newspaper or publication a name similar to that of
the Arkansas State Employment Service or any other governmental agency.
(d) No employment agency shall print or stamp on any receipt or on any
contract used by the agency any part of this subchapter unless the entire
section from which the part is taken is printed or stamped thereon.
(e) No employment agency shall allow any person in its employment to
use any names other than their legal names in the course of and in respect to
their employment with the agency.
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
(f) No employment agency or its employees or agents shall give any
information or make any representation to any applicant, where the agency or
its employees or agents know or reasonably should know that the information
or representation is false.
(g) No employment agency or its employees or agents shall knowingly
withhold from a job applicant any information material to a job to which that
applicant is referred.
(h) No employment agent or its agents or employees shall engage in any
conduct in the course of its business that constitutes a fraudulent,
dishonest, or deceptive practice, whether or not the conduct is prohibited by
this subchapter.
(i) No contracts, forms, or schedules used by employment agencies in
their dealings with the public shall contain any false, ambiguous, or
misleading information.

11-11-225. Miscellaneous restrictions and requirements.
In addition to other provisions of this subchapter, the following
provisions shall govern each and every employment agency:
(1) Every employment agent or agency shall display his, her, or
its license in a conspicuous place in the main office of the agency. Managers
and counselors shall display their licenses in a conspicuous place in their
offices or work areas;
(2)(A) All advertising by an employment agency of any form or
kind shall include the words “employment agency” or “personnel agency”.
(B) Advertising for an employment position with the agency
itself shall clearly convey the information that the job position offered is
with the employment agency publishing the advertisement;
(3) No employment agency or its agents or employees shall
receive or require any applicant to execute any power of attorney, assignment
of wages or salary, or note authorizing the confession of judgment;
(4) No employment agent, by himself or herself, or by his or her
agents or employees, shall solicit, persuade, or induce any employee to leave
any employment in which the employment agent or his or her agent has placed
the employee, nor shall any employment agency or any of its agents or
employees solicit, persuade, or induce any employer to discharge any
employee, nor shall any employment agent, or his or her agents or employees,
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
divide or offer to divide or share directly or indirectly any fee, charge, or
compensation received, or to be received, from an employee with any employer
or persons in any way connected with the business thereof;
(5)(A) No employment agent by himself or herself or by his or
her agents or employees shall give or promise to give anything of intrinsic
value to any employer or applicant for employment as an inducement to use the
services of his or her employment agency.
(B) No fee shall be solicited or accepted as an
application or registration fee by an employment agent for the purpose of
registering any person as an applicant for employment;
(6) No employment agency or its agents or employees shall
advertise or make a referral for any job position without having first
obtained a bona fide job order therefor;
(7) No employment agency or its agents or employees shall refer
an applicant for a job or job interview unless the applicant has been
personally interviewed by the employment agency or its agents or employees or
has corresponded with the employment agency with the specific purpose of
securing employment through that employment agency;
(8)(A) Every employment agency shall inform the public by a
conspicuous sign or poster that the employment agency is subject to the
requirements of this subchapter, which is administered and enforced by the
Division of Labor.
(B) The division shall prepare and distribute the sign or
poster to be used by agencies to comply with this subdivision (8);
(9) No employment agency or its agents or employees shall
knowingly send an applicant to any place where a strike, lockout, or other
labor dispute exists;
(10) No agency shall use any trade name or business identity
similar to, or reasonably likely to be confused with, the trade name or
business identity of an existing agency or any governmental nonprofit
employment agency;
(11) No employment agency shall refer an applicant to a
situation, employment, or occupation prohibited by law;
(12) No employment agency shall charge a fee to an employee for
any services other than actual placement of an applicant;
(13) No employment agency shall charge an applicant a fee for
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
accepting employment with the employment agency or any subsidiary of that
agency;
(14) Any information regarding an applicant's background or
credit, from whatever source obtained, shall be used for no purpose other
than assisting the applicant in securing employment. However, an employment
agency may use background and credit information regarding an applicant in
determining whether to conduct placement services for the applicant if the
applicant gives written authorization for securing the information and
understands the purpose for which the information is secured;
(15) No employment agency or its agents or employees shall
engage in any practice that discriminates against any person on the basis of
race, color, sex, age, religion, or national origin;
(16) Under no circumstances shall more than one (1) fee for any
one (1) placement be charged any applicant;
(17) No contracts, forms, or schedules used by employment
agencies shall contain any provisions in conflict with the provisions of this
subchapter; and
(18) All refunds due shall be made by the agency by cash, check,
or money order promptly when due.

11-11-226. Designation of manager required.
(a) Every employment agency shall designate an agency manager at each
office location of that agency, who shall be responsible for the general
management, administration, and operation of that office location.
(b) The agency manager must comply with the licensing requirements of
§§ 11-11-210 — 11-11-212, 11-11-214, 11-11-217, 11-11-218, 11-11-220(a)(1)
and (b), and 11-11-226.
(c) Every employment agency must maintain an agency manager at each of
its office locations.

11-11-227. Fee restrictions and requirements.
(a) When employment lasts less than ninety (90) calendar days,
regardless of the reason, no employment agency may charge an employee a fee
of more than one-ninetieth (1/90th) of the permanent placement fee for each
calendar day of the employment. Under no circumstances shall the fee exceed
twenty percent (20%) of an employee's actual gross earnings if employment
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
lasts less than thirty (30) days or forty percent (40%) of an employee's
actual gross earnings if employment lasts more than thirty (30) days but less
than ninety (90) days.
(b)(1) When a promissory note is used by the agency, it shall be
clearly identified as such and shall not be executed until the placement is
made.
(2) The defense of no or insufficient consideration shall be
good as against a holder of any such employment agency fee note.
(c)(1) When a dispute concerning a fee exists, the Division of Labor
may conduct an investigation to determine all of the facts concerning the
dispute. Thereafter, the Director of the Division of Labor shall issue a
decision and order resolving the dispute.
(2) Any person aggrieved by this decision and order may obtain
review of this decision and order pursuant to § 11-11-222.
(d)(1) Any schedule of fees to be charged by an employment agency for
its services shall be furnished to all applicants upon making application
with the agency.
(2)(A) The forms, fee schedules, and contracts utilized by an
employment agency shall contain no ambiguous, false, or misleading
information.
(B) No contract or fee schedule shall contain smaller than
eight-point type.
(e)(1) All fee schedules used in the business of an employment agency
must be furnished to job applicants and fee-paying employers and shall state
in dollars and cents the amount of any fee charged by the agency for its
services.
(2) Percentages shall not be used by agencies in schedules of
fees to be charged for their services, except when the annual salary for a
job is twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) or more.
(f) It shall be unlawful for any employment agency to impose, enforce,
collect, or receive a fee for performance of any service for a job applicant,
or for a prospective employer, unless the agency makes every reasonable
effort to disclose the exact dollar amount of the fee to the applicant or
prospective employer prior to commencement of employment of an applicant by
an employer.
(g) Nothing in this section or this subchapter shall be construed to
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
prohibit an employment agency from contracting with an employer on a fee-paid
basis to pay the fee for the placement services for an employee without an
actual job placement or to prohibit an agency from charging a fee to an
employer for a retained services contract to search for applicants for an
employer without an actual job placement.

11-11-228. Filing of fee schedule, forms, and contracts required.
(a) It shall be the duty of every employment agency to file with the
Division of Labor a schedule of all fees, charges, and commissions that the
agency expects to charge and collect for its service, together with a copy of
all forms and contracts to be used in dealings with the public in the
operation of its business.
(b) The fee schedules, contracts, and forms shall be filed with the
division on the date of the agency's application for initial or renewal
licensing under this subchapter.
(c) Any amendments or supplements to fee schedules, contracts, or
forms filed with the division must be filed at least fifteen (15) days before
the amendment or supplement is to become effective.
(d) It shall be unlawful for any employment agency to charge, demand,
collect, or receive a greater compensation for any service performed by the
agency than is specified in fee schedules filed with the division or than is
specified by this subchapter.

11-11-229. Records required.
(a) It shall be the duty of every employment agency to keep a complete
record of all orders for employees that are received from prospective
employers. This record shall contain the date when the order was received,
the name and address of the employer seeking the services of an employee, the
name of the individual placing the order, the duties of the position to be
filled, the qualifications required of the employee, the salary or wages to
be paid, and the probable duration of the job.
(b) It shall be the duty of every employment agency to keep a complete
record of each applicant who is referred by the agency to an employer for a
job interview. This record shall contain the date when the applicant was
referred to a prospective employer for a job or interview, the name of the
applicant, and the name of the firm to whom the applicant is referred.
02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103

SB278
(c)(1) It shall be the duty of every employment agency to keep a
complete register called a “business transaction record”, which shall consist
of the name of the individual placed, the date of the placement, the name of
the employer, the starting date of the position, the starting salary, the
amount of the fee charged, and the remarks column.
(2) The remarks column will state the amount of any adjustment
or refund made.
(d)(1) Prior to referral of any person to a job or interview or prior
to placement of any job advertisement, an employment agency must have a
current bona fide job order.
(2) It shall be the duty of every employment agency to maintain
a copy of any job advertisement and the job order pertaining to any
advertisement in a readily available record.
(e) All of the records listed in this section shall be kept in the
employment agency office and shall be open during office hours to inspection
by the Division of Labor and its duly authorized agents.
(f) No employment agent or his or her employee shall knowingly make
any false entry or omission in the records.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 19-6-201(17), concerning the enumeration of
general revenues of the state, is repealed.
(17) Employment agency licenses, as enacted by Acts 1975, No.
493, known as the “Arkansas Private Employment Agency Act of 1975”, and all
laws amendatory thereto, § 11-11-201 et seq.;












02/21/2025 3:52:17 PM LGL103